Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1585
Regional housing agency; additional members; procedure.

After a regional housing agency has been established, any additional city or county may elect to participate as a member of such regional housing agency upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance to such effect containing, in substance, the findings provided in section 71-1581, if a majority of the existing commissioners of such regional housing agency and all participating political subdivisions, by action of their respective governing bodies, consent to such additional member or members.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 14.